Hawaii statutes.
§200-42 Notice to owner. A state or
county agency, upon taking custody of any vessel, shall immediately post a
written notice on the vessel and send a duplicate original by registered or
certified mail, with a return receipt requested, to any owner registered with
the department or documented by the United States Coast Guard or any lien
holder or operator of the vessel on record with the department or the United
States Coast Guard at their respective last known address on record with the
department or the United States Coast Guard. The notice shall contain a brief
description of the vessel, the location of custody, and the intended
disposition of the vessel if not repossessed within twenty days after the
mailing of the notice. Such owner, lien holder, or operator, of the vessel
shall have ten days after receipt of the mailed notice to request in writing an
administrative hearing pursuant to chapter 91 from the state or county agency
that took custody of the vessel. This administrative hearing is solely for the
purpose of allowing the owner, lien holder, or operator of an impounded vessel
to contest the basis given for the impoundment of the vessel. The hearing
shall be held within five working days of the state or county agency's receipt
of the written request. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 70, §2; am L
2012, c 146, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next